Tennessee, session 114, SB2459.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-903(c)(2), is amended by
deleting the second sentence of the subdivision and substituting:
The department of children's services shall create and disseminate an annual report to
the director of the administrative office of the courts, the commissioner of the department
of mental health and substance abuse services, the council of juvenile and family court
judges, the commission on children and youth, and the chairs of the civil justice
committee of the house of representatives and the judiciary committee of the senate.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2459
012096
- 1 -